Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 82 O.S. 2021, Section 1324.16, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1324.16. A. Except as otherwise provided by law:
1. The term of office of every member elected to an original
board shall be until the date of the annual meeting of the
participating members of either the first, second or third year
following the year of the incorporation of the district. Members
HB4230 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

shal l serve until their successors are elected and have qualified.
As nearly as possible, the terms of an equal number of directors on
any such board shall expire on each of the dates;
2. The bylaws of the district shall specify the length of the
term of office of its directors, which term shall not exceed six (6)
years. At the annual meeting of each year after the year of the
election of the original board members, elections shall be held to
elect directors to fill any position on the board, the term of
office of which has expired, and any director so elected shall hold
office until a successor is elected and has qualified. A director
may be elected to succeeding terms without limitation; and
3. For the purpose of election of board members and for such
other purposes as the bylaws may prescribe, annual meetings of
participating members shall be held by each district each year
following the year of incorporation of such district. The board of
directors shall cause notice of the time and place of each annual
meeting and the purpose thereof to be given to each of its
participating members. Each participating member shall be entitled
to a single vote, regardless of the number of benefit units to which
the member has subscribed.
B. 1. A requirement for qualification to serve as a board
member for a rural water district or a nonprofit rural water
corporation shall be a written pledge that upon election such board
member shall attend a minimum of six (6) hours of workshop training
HB4230 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

to b e offered periodically on a regional basis within twelve (12)
months following election of such board member, and to be organized
by the Oklahoma Water Resources Board in cooperation with the
Oklahoma Rural Water Association or a qualified state supplier with
the purpose of study and instruction in areas of district financing,
law, and the ethics, duties and responsibilities of district board
members. Beginning July 1, 2001, all new and existing board members
shall be required to obtain continuing education by attending a
minimum of six (6) hours of workshop training every three (3) years.
2. The district or corporation shall reimburse all reasonable
expenses incurred by any board member for attending such training
workshop.
3. To avoid members having to interfere with their jobs or
employment, such training sessions may be divided into three-hour
segments, and insofar as possible be scheduled for evening sessions.
Technology center school facilities, college facilities or other
public facilities may be utilized in all parts of the state for
convenience of the members. Such workshops must be offered within
seventy-five (75) miles of the members' residences.
C. Should any pledging board member fail to attend the workshop
training as required in subsection B of this section, he or she
shall be deemed ineligible to serve as a board member commencing at
the next regularly scheduled meeting of the board following the
twelve-month period. The remaining board members shall select from
HB4230 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

the membership, as provided by the district or corporation bylaws,
another qualified member to fill the vacancy and that person shall
pledge to attend the workshop training provided for in this section.
The appointed member shall only serve until the next regularly
scheduled election of board members and an election shall be held to
fill the unexpired term of the vacated position.
D. Upon the election of a board member, the provisions of
Sections 481 through 487 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
relating to nepotism shall not prohibit any employee already in the
service of the district from continuing in such service or from
promotion therein. Provided, however, the board member related to
the employee shall be excused from the board meeting during any
discussion of or action taken on any matter that could affect the
employment or compensation for employment of such employee.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ENERGY AND NATURAL RESOURCES
OVERSIGHT, dated 03/04/2026 - DO PASS, As Coauthored.







HB4230 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.